Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1105
Personal or household activity.

The Data Privacy Act does not apply to the processing of personal data by a person in the course of a purely personal or household activity.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 5.
January 1, 2025